Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3,112
Employment of person removed under immigration and customs enforcement or convicted for certain violations; tax credit or exemption; prohibited.

Notwithstanding any provision of law, the Tax Commissioner shall not approve or grant to any person any tax credit, exemption, or refund for the employment of any person who has been removed from the United States pursuant to proceedings initiated by the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement, or other competent authority, or who has been convicted in a criminal court proceeding for offenses related to illegal immigration. Any benefits that were received prior to the removal or conviction will be recaptured to the extent the benefits were received based on the employment of such persons.

Laws 1987, LB 523, § 46;

Laws 2007, LB223, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 388.